Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-802
Chief executive officer of Department of Health and Human Services; duties.

Pursuant to the compact as provided in section 83-801, the chief executive officer of the Department of Health and Human Services or such person as the chief executive officer may designate shall be the compact administrator and shall have the power to promulgate rules and regulations to carry out more effectively the terms of the compact. The compact administrator is hereby authorized, empowered, and directed to cooperate with all departments, agencies, and officers of and in the government of this state and its subdivisions in facilitating the proper administration of the compact or of any supplementary agreement or agreements entered into by this state thereunder.

Laws 1969, c. 556, § 2, p. 2271;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 957;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 806.